dev/gsoc2011/monodix/noun/noun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="মা__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দেরকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="সই__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ঝড়__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="nt" /><s n="nn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="লড়াই"><i>লড়াই</i><par n="সই__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এন"><i>এন</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="জুলাই"><i>জুলাই</i><par n="সই__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অস্তিত্ব"><i>অস্তিত্ব</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="কান"><i>কান</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সংযম"><i>সংযম</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="জট"><i>জট</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="স্ত্রী"><i>স্ত্রী</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="সভানেত্রী"><i>সভানেত্রী</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ছাত্রী"><i>ছাত্রী</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="আনারস"><i>আনারস</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="কেন্দ্র"><i>কেন্দ্র</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘেরাও"><i>ঘেরাও</i><par n="সই__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জীবনযাপন"><i>জীবনযাপন</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="খোঁজ"><i>খোঁজ</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মা"><i>মা</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="লাভ"><i>লাভ</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মহিলা"><i>মহিলা</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="অভিনেত্রী"><i>অভিনেত্রী</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="পুতুল"><i>পুতুল</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্রোঞ্জ"><i>ব্রোঞ্জ</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="নেত্রী"><i>নেত্রী</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="মাংস"><i>মাংস</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="গৃহবধূ"><i>গৃহবধূ</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্ষতিপূরণ"><i>ক্ষতিপূরণ</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ছিনতাই"><i>ছিনতাই</i><par n="সই__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ডিএনএ"><i>ডিএনএ</i><par n="সই__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বাছাই"><i>বাছাই</i><par n="সই__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ভাল"><i>ভাল</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="নারী"><i>নারী</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="দৌরাত্ম্য"><i>দৌরাত্ম্য</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="মেয়ে"><i>মেয়ে</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="গ্রহণ"><i>গ্রহণ</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সই"><i>সই</i><par n="সই__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কুমারী"><i>কুমারী</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="বিজ্ঞাপন"><i>বিজ্ঞাপন</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="রেডিও"><i>রেডিও</i><par n="সই__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বালিকা"><i>বালিকা</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="জিপিএ"><i>জিপিএ</i><par n="সই__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="তরুণী"><i>তরুণী</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="অবস্থান"><i>অবস্থান</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="গৃহিণী"><i>গৃহিণী</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="দেবী"><i>দেবী</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ছাদ"><i>ছাদ</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="কন্যা"><i>কন্যা</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="জননী"><i>জননী</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="বউ"><i>বউ</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্লক"><i>ব্লক</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সাক্ষাত্কার"><i>সাক্ষাত্কার</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="দেহ"><i>দেহ</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="কিশোরী"><i>কিশোরী</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="খণ্ড"><i>খণ্ড</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ভারসাম্য"><i>ভারসাম্য</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সুদ"><i>সুদ</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="নায়িকা"><i>নায়িকা</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="অয়েল"><i>অয়েল</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="আয়তন"><i>আয়তন</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ধরণ"><i>ধরণ</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="নির্ণয়"><i>নির্ণয়</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="সন"><i>সন</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ছায়াপথ"><i>ছায়াপথ</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="শাস্ত্র"><i>শাস্ত্র</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বিধবা"><i>বিধবা</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="সংস্পর্শ"><i>সংস্পর্শ</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বীজগণিত"><i>বীজগণিত</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশেষ্য"><i>বিশেষ্য</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="চাকুরি"><i>চাকুরি</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="আত্মীয়"><i>আত্মীয়</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="গ্রামাঞ্চল"><i>গ্রামাঞ্চল</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="পদচিহ্ন"><i>পদচিহ্ন</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ধর্মগ্রন্থ"><i>ধর্মগ্রন্থ</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="আবাস"><i>আবাস</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="শিং"><i>শিং</i><par n="সই__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="তার"><i>তার</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="লেখিকা"><i>লেখিকা</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="সমকোণ"><i>সমকোণ</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="লেডি"><i>লেডি</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="জলাধার"><i>জলাধার</i><par n="ঝড়__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="গায়িকা"><i>গায়িকা</i><par n="মা__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="কিউ"><i>কিউ</i><par n="সই__n_mf"/></e>
